Utah statutes.
78B-4-404.   Trail boards listing inherent risks and limitations on liability.

Ski area operators shall post trail boards at one or more prominent locations within each ski area which shall include a list of the inherent risks of skiing, and the limitations on liability of ski area operators, as defined in this part.

